Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 6. Enforcement Remedies.

§ 63.2-1927.
Assertion of lien; effect.

Ten days after service of the notice containing the proposed administrative support order as provided in §

63.2-1916

, or immediately upon receipt by the Department of a court order or foreign support order, a lien may be asserted by the Commissioner upon the real or personal property of the debtor. The claim of the Department for a support debt, not paid when due, shall be a lien when docketed against all property of the debtor in the county or city where docketed with priority of a secured creditor. The Department’s lien shall take priority over all other debts and creditors under state law of such debtor including the proceeds or anticipated proceeds of a personal injury or wrongful death award or settlement except that the Department’s lien shall be inferior to those liens created under §

8.01-66.2

or §

8.01-66.9

, any statutory right of subrogation accruing to a health insurance provider, and the lien of the attorney representing the injured person in the personal injury or wrongful death action. However, the lien of the Department shall be subordinate to the lien of any prior mortgagee. The Department shall have the sole authority to negotiate settlement of its liens. Settlement of the Department’s support liens does not affect the remaining support arrearages. This lien shall be separate and apart from, and in addition to, any other lien created by, or provided for, in this title. Such order, when an abstract thereof is docketed with the circuit court, shall have the same effect as a docketed abstract of judgment from another Virginia court.

Whenever a support lien has been filed and there is in the possession of any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth having notice of such lien, any property which may be subject to the support lien, such property shall not be paid over, released, sold, transferred, encumbered or conveyed, except as provided for by the exemptions contained in §

63.2-1933

, unless a written release or waiver signed by the Commissioner has been delivered to such person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth or unless a determination has been made in a hearing pursuant to §

63.2-1916

or by a court ordering release of such support lien on the basis that no debt exists or that the debt has been satisfied.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-254; 1976, c. 357; 1988, c. 906; 2002, c. 747; 2003, cc. 929, 942.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 929 and 942 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “court order or foreign support order” for “support order from a jurisdiction outside of Virginia,” in the first sentence, and inserted the third, fifth and sixth sentences.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1446 (1974).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18 Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees. § 18.03 Equity. Bryson.

§ 63.2-1928.
Service of lien.

The Commissioner may at any time after the filing of a support lien serve a copy of said lien upon any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth in possession of earnings, or deposits or balances held in any bank account of any nature that are due, owing, or belonging to such debtor. Such support lien shall be served upon the person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth either in the manner prescribed for the service of warrant in a civil action or by certified mail, return receipt requested. At any time after a support lien has been filed, the Director may notify consumer credit reporting agencies that the lien has been filed. No lien filed under §

63.2-1927

shall have any effect against earnings or bank deposits or balances unless it states the amount of the support debt accrued and unless service upon such person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth in possession of earnings or bank accounts, deposits or balances is accomplished pursuant to this section.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-255; 1976, c. 357; 1988, c. 906; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1929.
Orders to withhold and to deliver property of debtor; issuance and service; contents; right to appeal; answer; effect; delivery of property; bond to release; fee; exemptions.

After notice containing an administrative support order has been served or service has been waived or accepted, an opportunity for a hearing has been exhausted, and a copy of the order furnished as provided for in §

63.2-1916

, or whenever a court order for child or child and spousal support has been entered, the Commissioner is authorized to issue to any person, firm, corporation, association, or political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth orders to withhold and to deliver property of any kind, including, but not restricted to, income of the debtor, when the Commissioner has reason to believe that there is in the possession of such person, firm, corporation, association, or political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth property that is due, owing, or belonging to such debtor. The orders to withhold and to deliver shall take priority over all other debts and creditors under state law of such debtor, including the proceeds or anticipated proceeds of a personal injury or wrongful death award or settlement, except that the Department’s lien shall be inferior to those liens created under §

8.01-66.2

or

8.01-66.9

, any statutory right of subrogation accruing to a health insurance provider, and the lien of the attorney representing the injured person in the personal injury or wrongful death action. However, orders to withhold and to deliver shall not take priority with respect to a prior payroll deduction or income withholding order pursuant to §

20-79.1

,

20-79.2

,

63.2-1923

, or

63.2-1924

. The Department shall have the sole authority to negotiate settlement of its liens. Settlement of the Department’s support liens does not affect the remaining support arrearages.

The order to withhold shall also be served upon the debtor within a reasonable time thereafter, and shall state the amount of the support debt accrued. The order shall state in summary the terms of §§

63.2-1925

and

63.2-1930

and shall be served in the manner prescribed for the service of a warrant in a civil action, by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by electronic means. The order to withhold shall advise the debtor that this order has been issued to cause the property of the debtor to be taken to satisfy the debt and advise of property that may be exempted from this order. The order shall also advise the debtor of a right to appeal such order based upon a mistake of fact and that if no appeal is made within 10 days of being served, his property is subject to be taken.

If the debtor believes such property is exempt from this debt, within 10 days of the date of service of the order to withhold, the debtor may file an appeal to the Commissioner stating any exemptions that may be applicable. If the Commissioner receives a timely appeal, a hearing shall be promptly scheduled before a hearing officer upon reasonable notice to the obligee. The Commissioner may delegate authority to conduct the hearing to a duly qualified hearing officer who shall consider the debtor’s appeal. Action by the Commissioner under the provisions of this chapter to collect such support debt shall be valid and enforceable during the pendency of any appeal.The decision of the hearing officer shall be in writing and shall set forth the debtor’s rights to appeal an adverse decision of the hearing officer pursuant to §

63.2-1943

. The decision shall be served upon the debtor in accordance with the provisions of §

8.01-296

,

8.01-327

, or

8.01-329

, mailed to the debtor at his last known address by certified mail, return receipt requested, or provided by electronic means or service may be waived. A copy of such decision shall also be provided to the obligee. Such decision shall establish whether the debtor’s property is exempt under state or federal laws and regulations.

Any person, firm, corporation, association, or political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth upon whom service has been made is hereby required to answer such order to withhold within 10 days, exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall file true answers to the matters inquired of therein. In the event that there is in the possession of any such person, firm, corporation, association, or political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth any property that may be subject to the claim of the Department, such property shall be withheld immediately upon receipt of the order to withhold, together with any additional property received by such person, firm, corporation, association, or political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth valued up to the amount of the order until receipt of an order to deliver or release. The property shall be delivered to the Commissioner upon receipt of an order to deliver; however, distribution of the property shall not be made during pendency of all appeals. Where money is due and owing under any contract of employment, express or implied, or is held by any person, firm, corporation, association, or political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth subject to withdrawal by the debtor, such money shall be delivered by remittance payable to the order of the Treasurer of Virginia. The person, firm, corporation, association, or political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth herein specified shall be entitled to receive from such debtor a fee of $5 for each answer or remittance on account of such debtor. The foregoing is subject to the exemptions contained in §§

63.2-1925

and

63.2-1933

.

Delivery to the Commissioner shall serve as full acquittance and the Commonwealth warrants and represents that it shall defend and hold harmless for such actions persons delivering money or property to the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

An order issued to an employer for withholding from the earnings of an employee or independent contractor pursuant to this section shall conform to §

20-79.3

. The rights and obligations of an employer with respect to the order are set out in §

20-79.3

.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-256; 1975, cc. 54, 311; 1976, c. 357; 1977, c. 662; 1980, c. 243; 1983, c. 481; 1984, c. 652; 1985, c. 488; 1987, c. 640; 1988, c. 906; 1990, cc. 896, 950; 1992, c. 716; 1998, c. 727; 2002, c. 747; 2003, cc. 929, 942; 2016, c. 29; 2020, c. 722.

Cross references.

As to ownership during lifetime, garnishment, attachment, or levy of multiple-party bank accounts, see §

6.2-606

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 722, cl. 3 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to define or redefine ‘independent contractor’ under the common law or for any purpose other than the withholding of income of an independent contractor for the payment of a support obligation.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 929 and 942 are nearly identical, and in subsection A, substituted “including the proceeds or anticipated proceeds . . . not take priority” for “except,” and inserted the last sentence. In addition, c. 942 substituted “10” for “ten” in subsections C and D and substituted “$5” for “five dollars” in subsection D.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 29, in subsection B, inserted “or by electronic means”; in the second paragraph of subsection C, inserted “or provided by electronic means” in the second sentence and substituted “provided” for “mailed” in the third sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 722, in subsections A and D, substituted “or political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth” for “political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth” or “political subdivision, or department of the Commonwealth”; in subsection D, substituted “In the event that” for “In the event” in the second sentence, substituted “association” for “or association” in the second-to-last sentence and inserted “association” in the penultimate sentence; in subsection F, inserted “or independent contractor” in the first sentence and made stylistic changes.

§ 63.2-1930.
Civil liability upon failure to comply with lien, order, etc.

Should any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision or department of this Commonwealth fail to answer an order to withhold and deliver within the time prescribed herein, or fail or refuse to deliver property pursuant to said order, or after actual notice of filing of a support lien, pay over, release, sell, transfer, or convey real or personal property subject to a support lien to or for the benefit of the debtor or any other person, or fail or refuse to surrender upon demand property distrained under §

63.2-1933

or fail or refuse to honor a voluntary assignment of wages under §

63.2-1945

presented by the Commissioner, such person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision or department of this Commonwealth shall be liable to the Department in an amount equal to 100 percent of the value of the debt which is the basis of the lien, order to withhold and deliver, distraint, or an income withholding order or voluntary assignment of wages. A noncustodial parent’s employer issued an income withholding order by first-class mail or electronic means pursuant to §

63.2-1923

or

63.2-1924

shall not be liable to the Department unless the Department shows that such employer had actual notice of the withholding order.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-258; 1976, c. 357; 1985, c. 488; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 469; 2016, c. 29.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 469 added the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 29 inserted “or electronic means” and made minor stlistic changes in the last sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1446 (1974).

§ 63.2-1931.
Effect of service on banks, savings institutions, etc.

Service of a lien or orders to withhold and deliver or any other notice or document authorized by this chapter on the main office or headquarters or registered agent of any bank, savings institution or other financial institution or broker-dealer as defined in §

13.1-501

or any other place designated by such financial institution or broker-dealer shall be effective as to any accounts, credits or other personal property (excluding property held in a safe-deposit box) of the noncustodial parent held by that institution or broker-dealer. The bank, savings institution, financial institution or broker-dealer may accept service or treat service as valid even though made at a point other than those specified above.

Within 45 days of receipt of an answer from any bank, savings institution or other financial institution or broker-dealer indicating that a support debtor may have an interest in funds in a joint account, the Department shall serve notice of the order to withhold on all joint account holders at the address for each account holder as provided by the bank, savings institution or other financial institution or broker-dealer in the same manner as service upon the support debtor. A copy of the notice shall be served on the financial institution or broker-dealer by certified mail, return receipt requested. Each account holder may appeal the action to a hearing officer as provided in §

63.2-1929

. However, the issue to be determined by the hearing officer is limited to whether the support debtor has any interest in the joint account which is being held based on the support debtor’s contribution to the account. Upon satisfactory proof that the support debtor has no interest in the joint account, the Department shall release the order to withhold. Upon receipt of the copy of the notice to the joint account holders, the financial institution or broker-dealer shall treat the initial order to withhold as continuing in effect over the entire property being withheld until a release or order to deliver is served by the Department or until the ninety-day period set forth in the following paragraph expires. If the financial institution or broker-dealer does not receive a copy of the notice to the joint account holders within 45 days from delivery of its answer, it may treat the order to withhold as released.

Upon the determination that the support debtor has some interest in the joint account, the Department shall initiate a petition in the general district court or in the circuit court, if the joint account and the amount claimed against the support debtor each exceed $10,000, for the jurisdiction in which the support debtor or any joint account owner resides in order that the court may make a determination of the extent of the interest of the support debtor in the joint account, based on the amount the support debtor contributed to the account. If the support debtor and all account owners are nonresidents, venue shall be where the support obligee resides or where the property is located. In cases where the joint account is owned by persons married to each other, the funds in the account shall belong to them equally unless there is clear and convincing evidence otherwise. The Department shall serve a copy of the petition on the financial institution or broker-dealer by certified mail, return receipt requested. If the financial institution or broker-dealer does not receive a copy of the petition within ninety days of receipt of the notice to the joint account holders, it may treat the order to withhold as released.

Notwithstanding service or receipt of such order of support, the financial institution may pay any check deposited with it or another financial institution on or before the date of service or receipt of the order of support on it.

History.

1988, cc. 795, 906, § 63.1-260.1; 1990, c. 950; 1992, c. 111; 2002, c. 747; 2009, c. 125.

Cross references.

As to ownership during lifetime, garnishment, attachment, or levy of multiple-party bank accounts, see §

6.2-606

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 125, in the second paragraph, substituted “45 days” for twenty-one days” in the first and last sentences.

§ 63.2-1932.
Data exchange agreements authorized; immunity.

The Commissioner is authorized and shall, as feasible, enter into agreements with financial institutions doing business in the Commonwealth to develop and operate, in conjunction with such financial institutions, a data match system using automated data exchanges to the maximum extent feasible. Pursuant to a data match system, a financial institution shall provide on a periodic basis, but no more frequently than every three months, the account title, record address, social security number or other taxpayer identification number, for any person in arrears in the payment of child support who is identified by the Department in the request by social security number or other taxpayer identification number.

Any such agreement shall provide for the following:

The financial institution shall be obligated to match only those accounts for which a social security number or taxpayer identification number is provided by the Department, and shall have no obligation to match or identify any account based on a person’s name or any other identifying information;

The financial institution shall provide the account title, record address, social security number or taxpayer identification number for any account matching the social security number and taxpayer identification number provided by the Department. It shall be the Department’s responsibility to determine whether such account is an account subject to a lien, or order to withhold and deliver in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

The financial institution shall be given a reasonable time in which to respond to each data match request, based upon the capabilities of the financial institution to handle the data match system, but in no event less than thirty days; and

The financial institution shall have no obligation to hold, encumber, or surrender assets in any account based on a match until it is served with a lien or order to withhold and deliver in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.The Department is authorized to pay a reasonable fee to a financial institution for conducting the data match, not to exceed the actual costs incurred by such financial institution and may assess and recover actual costs incurred from noncustodial parents identified as a result of the data match.A financial institution providing information in accordance with this section shall not be liable to any account holder or other person for any disclosure of information to the Department, for encumbering or surrendering any assets held by such financial institution in response to a lien or order to withhold and deliver issued by the Department, or for any other action taken pursuant to this section, including individual or mechanical errors, provided such action does not constitute gross negligence or willful misconduct.For purposes of this section, “account” means a demand deposit account, checking or negotiable withdrawal order account, savings account, time deposit account, share account, share draft account or money market mutual fund account maintained in this Commonwealth.

History.

1997, cc. 796, 895, § 63.1-260.3; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1932.1.
Automated administrative enforcement in interstate cases.

The Department shall use high-volume automated administrative enforcement, to the same extent as used for intrastate cases, in response to a request made by another state to enforce support orders, and shall promptly report the results of such enforcement procedure to the requesting state. For purposes of this section, “high volume automated administrative enforcement” in interstate cases means, on the request of another state, the identification by the Department, through automated data matches with financial institutions and other entities where assets may be found, of assets owned by persons who owe child support in other states, and the seizure of such assets by the Department through levy or other appropriate processes.

The Department may, by electronic or other means, transmit to another state a request for assistance in enforcing child support orders through high-volume automated administrative enforcement. The request shall (i) include such information as will enable the state to which the request is transmitted to compare the information about the cases to the information in the data bases of the state; and (ii) shall constitute a certification by the Department of the amount of support in arrears and of the Department’s compliance with all procedural due process requirements applicable to each case.

If the Department provides assistance to another state pursuant to this section, neither the Department nor the state shall consider the case to be transferred to the caseload of the other state.

The Department shall maintain records of (i) the number of such requests for assistance pursuant to this section; (ii) the number of cases for which the Department collected support in response to such a request; and (iii) the amount of such collected support.

History.

2002, c. 112, § 63.1-260.4.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 112 enacted § 63.1-260.4, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 112 has been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 63.2-1933.
Distraint, seizure and sale of property subject to liens.

Whenever a support lien has been filed pursuant to §

63.2-1927

, the Commissioner may collect the support debt stated in such lien by distraint, seizure and sale of the property subject to such lien. The Commissioner shall give notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, or electronic means to the debtor and by certified mail, return receipt requested, to any person known to have or claim an interest therein of the general description of the property to be sold and the time and place of sale of such property. A notice specifying the property to be sold shall be posted in at least two public places in the jurisdiction wherein the distraint has been made. The time of sale shall not be less than 10 nor more than 20 days from the date of posting of such notices. Such sale shall be conducted by the Commissioner, who shall proceed to sell such property by parcel or by lot at a public auction, and who may set a minimum reasonable price to include the expenses of making a levy and of advertising the sale, and if the amount bid for such property at the sale is not equal to the price so fixed, the Commissioner may declare such property to be purchased by the Department for such price, or may conduct another sale of such property pursuant to the provisions of this section. In the event of sale, the debtor’s account shall be credited with the amount for which the property has been sold. Property acquired by the Department as herein prescribed may be sold by the Commissioner at public or private sale, and the amount realized shall be placed in the state general fund to the credit of the Department. In all cases of sale, as aforesaid, the Commissioner shall issue a bill of sale or a deed to the purchaser and such bill of sale or deed shall be prima facie evidence of the right of the Commissioner to make such sale and conclusive evidence of the regularity of his proceeding in making the sale and shall transfer to the purchaser all right, title, and interest of the debtor in such property. The proceeds of any such sale, except in those cases wherein the property has been acquired by the Department, shall be first applied by the Commissioner to reimbursement of the costs of distraint and the sale, and thereafter in satisfaction of the delinquent account. Any excess which shall thereafter remain in the hands of the Commissioner shall be refunded to the debtor. Sums so refundable to a debtor may be subject to seizure or distraint by any taxing authority of the Commonwealth or its political subdivisions or by the Commissioner for new sums due and owing subsequent to the subject proceeding. Except as specifically provided in this chapter, there shall be exempt from attachment, distraint, seizure, execution and sale under this chapter such property as is exempt therefrom under the laws of this Commonwealth.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-261; 1975, cc. 311, 596; 1976, c. 357; 2002, c. 747; 2016, c. 29.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 29 inserted “by certified mail, return receipt requested, or electronic means” and “by certified mail, return receipt requested, to” in the second sentence and deleted the third sentence, which read “Such notice shall be given to such persons by certified mail, return receipt requested”; and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1446 (1974).

§ 63.2-1934.
Action for foreclosure of lien; satisfaction.

Whenever a support lien has been filed, an action in foreclosure of lien upon real or personal property may be brought in the circuit court of the jurisdiction wherein such real or personal property is or was located and the lien was filed. Judgment if rendered in favor of the Department shall be for the amount due, with costs, and the court shall allow, as part of the costs, the moneys paid for making and filing the claim of lien, and a reasonable attorney’s fee. The court shall order any property upon which any lien provided for by this chapter is established, to be sold by the sheriff of the proper jurisdiction to satisfy the lien and costs. The payment of the lien debt, costs and reasonable attorney’s fees, at any time before sale, shall satisfy the judgment of foreclosure. Where the net proceeds of sale upon application to the debt claimed do not satisfy the debt in full, the Department shall have judgment over any deficiency remaining unsatisfied and further levy upon other property of the judgment debtor may be made under the same execution. In all sales contemplated under this section, advertising of notice shall only be necessary for two weeks in a newspaper published in the jurisdiction where such property is located, and if there be no newspaper therein, then in the most convenient newspaper having a circulation in such jurisdiction. Remedies provided for herein are alternatives to remedies provided for in other sections of this chapter.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-262; 1976, c. 357; 1988, c. 906; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1446 (1974).

§ 63.2-1935.
Satisfaction of lien after foreclosure proceedings instituted; redemption.

Any person owning real property, or any interest in real property, against which a support lien has been filed and foreclosure instituted, shall have the right to pay the amount due, together with expenses of the proceedings and reasonable attorney fee to the Commissioner and upon such payment the Commissioner shall restore said property to him and all further proceedings in such foreclosure action shall cease. Such person shall also have the right within 240 days after sale of property foreclosed under §

63.2-1934

to redeem said property by making payment to the purchaser in the amount paid by the purchaser plus interest thereon at the rate of six per centum per annum.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-263; 1976, c. 357; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1936.
Procedures for posting security, bond or guarantee to secure payment of overdue support.

The Department shall require, if feasible and consistent with guidelines established by the Department, that the noncustodial parent post security or bond or give some guarantee to secure overdue payments. Advance notice shall be sent to the noncustodial parent setting forth (i) the amount of the delinquency, (ii) the proposed action to be taken by the Department, (iii) the method available for contesting the impending action and (iv) that only a “mistake of fact” as defined in §

63.2-1900

may be contested.

History.

1986, c. 594, § 63.1-250.4; 1988, c. 906; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1937.
Applications for occupational or other license to include social security or control number; suspension upon delinquency; procedure.

Every initial application for or application for renewal of a license, certificate, registration or other authorization to engage in a business, trade, profession or occupation issued by the Commonwealth pursuant to

Titles 22.1

, 38.2, 46.2 or 54.1 or any other provision of law shall require that the applicant provide his social security number or a control number issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to §

46.2-342

.

Upon 30 days’ notice to an obligor who (i) has failed to comply with a subpoena, summons or warrant relating to paternity or child support proceedings or (ii) is alleged to be delinquent in the payment of child support by a period of 90 days or more or for $5,000 or more, an obligee or the Department on behalf of an obligee, may petition either the court that entered or the court that is enforcing the order for child support for an order suspending any license, certificate, registration or other authorization to engage in a business, trade, profession or occupation, or recreational activity issued to the obligor by the Commonwealth pursuant to

Titles 22.1

, 29.1, 38.2, 46.2 or 54.1 or any other provision of law. The notice shall be sent in accordance with the provisions of §

8.01-296

,

8.01-327

, or

8.01-329

, by certified mail, with proof of actual receipt, or by electronic means. The notice shall specify that (a) the obligor has 30 days from the date of receipt to comply with the subpoena, summons or warrant or pay the delinquency or to reach an agreement with the obligee or the Department to pay the delinquency and (b) if compliance is not forthcoming or payment is not made or an agreement cannot be reached within that time, a petition will be filed seeking suspension of any license, certificate, registration or other authorization to engage in a business, trade, profession or occupation, or recreational license issued by the Commonwealth to the obligor.

The court shall not suspend a license, certificate, registration or authorization upon finding that an alternate remedy is available to the obligee or the Department that is likely to result in collection of the delinquency. Further, the court may refuse to order the suspension upon finding that (1) suspension would result in irreparable harm to the obligor or employees of the obligor or would not result in collection of the delinquency or (2) the obligor has made a demonstrated, good faith effort to reach an agreement with the obligee or the Department.

If the court finds that the obligor is delinquent in the payment of child support by 90 days or more or in an amount of $5,000 or more and holds a license, certificate, registration or other authority to engage in a business, trade, profession or occupation or recreational activity issued by the Commonwealth, it shall order suspension. The order shall require the obligor to surrender any license, certificate, registration or other such authorization to the issuing entity within 90 days of the date on which the order is entered. If at any time after entry of the order the obligor (A) pays the delinquency or (B) reaches an agreement with the obligee or the Department to satisfy the delinquency within a period not to exceed 10 years and makes at least one payment, representing at least five percent of the total delinquency or $500, whichever is greater, pursuant to the agreement, or (C) complies with the subpoena, summons or warrant or reaches an agreement with the Department with respect to the subpoena, summons or warrant, upon proof of payment or certification of the compliance or agreement, the court shall order reinstatement. Payment shall be proved by certified copy of the payment record issued by the Department or notarized statement of payment signed by the obligee. No fee shall be charged to a person who obtains reinstatement of a license, certificate, registration or authorization pursuant to this section.

History.

1994, c. 764, § 63.1-263.1; 1997, cc. 794, 857, 898; 2002, c. 747; 2016, c. 29.

Cross references.

As to contents of support orders, see §

20-60.3

.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 29, in the second paragraph, inserted “in accordance with the provisions of §

8.01-296

,

8.01-327

, or

8.01-329

,” and “or by electronic means” in the second sentence; and made minor stlistic changes.

Law Review.

For 1994 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 981 (1994).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-164. Decree Granting Custody and Maintenance Pendente Lite in a Divorce Proceeding, et seq.; No. 5-201 Child Support — Checklist for Drafting Orders, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 1.

§ 63.2-1938.
Commissioner may release lien or order or return seized property.

The Commissioner may at any time release a support lien, or order to withhold and deliver, on all or part of the property of the debtor, or return seized property without liability, if assurance of payment is deemed adequate by the Commissioner, or if such action will facilitate the collection of the debt, but such release or return shall not operate to prevent future action to collect from the same or other property.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-265; 1976, c. 357; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1939.
Commissioner may make demand, file and serve liens, when payments appear in jeopardy.

If the Commissioner finds that the collection of any support debt based upon subrogation to or authorization to enforce the amount of support ordered by any court order or decree of divorce is in jeopardy, he may make demand under §

63.2-1916

for immediate payment of the support debt. Upon failure or refusal immediately to pay such support debt, he may file and serve liens pursuant to §§

63.2-1927

and

63.2-1928

, without regard to the ten-day period provided for in §

63.2-1916

. However, no further action under §§

63.2-1929

,

63.2-1933

and

63.2-1934

may be taken until the notice requirements of §

63.2-1916

are met.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-266; 1976, c. 357; 1988, c. 906; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1940.
Reporting payment arrearage information to consumer credit reporting agencies.

The Division of Child Support Enforcement shall provide support payment arrearage information on noncustodial parents, as defined in §

63.2-100

, to consumer credit reporting agencies. Advance notice shall be sent to the noncustodial parent of the proposed release of arrearage information. The notice shall include information on the procedures available to the noncustodial parent for contesting the accuracy of the arrearage information.

History.

1988, c. 906, § 63.1-274.6; 1990, c. 836; 1991, cc. 545, 588; 1994, c. 665; 1997, cc. 796, 895; 2001, c. 573; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1940.1.
Publishing a most wanted delinquent parent list; coordinated arrests.

The Division of Child Support Enforcement shall (i) publish at regular intervals a list of the most wanted delinquent parents as determined by the Commissioner together with arrearage information and other identifying information, including but not limited to, a photograph, occupation and last known address for the purpose of locating such delinquent parents and (ii) periodically conduct coordinated arrests of delinquent parents in conjunction with state and local criminal justice agencies pursuant to § 16.1-278.16.

History.

2003, cc. 929, 942.